Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1803
Permit; State Veterinarian, authority; rules and regulations.

The State Veterinarian is hereby authorized to issue permits for the use of the pathogenic microorganisms described in section 71-1801 in the prevention or control of diseases of animals, if in the opinion of the Department of Health and Human Services there is sufficient warrant for their utilization for such purpose. In carrying out the duties of this section with reference to animals, the State Veterinarian shall take into consideration the certification made by the Department of Health and Human Services as provided for in section 71-1802. The State Veterinarian is further authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this section.

Laws 1943, c. 153, § 3, p. 562;

R.S.1943, § 71-1803;

Laws 1965, c. 334, § 8, p. 958;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 580;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 495.